Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 83.
[MARRIAGE].

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment, effective December 2, 2004, was proposed by initiative petition and adopted at the November 2004 general election by a vote of 753,770 for and 251,914 against.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

§ 1. Marriage.

Marriage consists only of the union of one man and one woman.

§ 2. Marital status.

Legal status for unmarried persons which is identical or substantially similar to marital status shall not be valid or recognized in Arkansas, except that the legislature may recognize a common law marriage from another state between a man and a woman.

§ 3. Capacity, rights, obligations, privileges, and immunities.

The legislature has the power to determine the capacity of persons to marry, subject to this amendment, and the legal rights, obligations, privileges, and immunities of marriage.